Utah statutes.
7-3-3.2.   Securities business permitted -- Activities conducted by
subsidiary -- Disclosure statements required.
(1)  A bank has all necessary and incidental powers to engage in the business
of purchasing, selling, underwriting, and dealing in securities, whether as a
principal for its own account or as agent or broker for a customer, subject to
the limitations in this section.
(2)  The securities business that a bank may conduct as a principal for its
own account is limited to the activities specified in Subsections (2)(a)
through (d).  A bank does not otherwise have power to enter securities
underwriting or act as a principal in issuance or marketing of securities.
(a)  A bank may purchase for investment and subsequently resell those types of
securities authorized by statute or rule of the commissioner, including,
without limitation, shares purchased in accordance with Section 7-3-21 and
government or other securities lawfully acquired for the investment or trading
portfolio of the bank or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates in accordance
with any limitation established by any other federal or state statute,
regulation, or rule.
(b)  A bank may sell securities of any kind acquired in the ordinary course of
business, including, without limitation, through foreclosure on pledged
securities.
(c)  A bank may underwrite or deal in securities issued by a municipality,
county, or other local governmental entity or an agency of any such
governmental entity, securities issued by a state or any of its agencies, or
securities issued by the federal government or any of its agencies.
(d)  A bank may establish or underwrite the securities of registered
investment companies that are limited to operating or investing in money
market funds or other short-term government or corporate debt instruments.
(3)  This section may not be interpreted to alter the traditional rights and
powers of banks to issue deposit instruments or similar instruments that
acknowledge receipt of monies for customers, even though the instruments may
for some purposes be considered securities.
(4)  Securities activities under this section, except those activities
described in Subsections (2)(a) and (b), shall be conducted only through a
subsidiary.  Any such subsidiary shall be established pursuant to rules that
the commissioner may adopt after notice and hearing.  Any such rules shall
further define the standards by which a securities subsidiary of a bank may be
established and operated, including the requirement for registration, if
required, as a broker-dealer with state, federal, and self-regulatory
agencies.  In addition to other standards that may be established by these
rules, a bank may not invest more than 10% of its total capital in a
securities subsidiary.  For purposes of that determination, total capital
shall be calculated in accordance with all other applicable statutes and rules
of the commissioner, including the effect of loans from the bank to the
subsidiary, together with capital standards established by the Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation.  Every loan made by the bank to a securities subsidiary
shall comply with applicable state and federal laws.  In all cases, each
subsidiary shall maintain separate corporate and financial records.
(5)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4), a bank may enter into a networking
agreement with a registered broker-dealer for the provision of brokerage
services to the bank's customers on the bank's premises without the need to
comply with Subsection (4), (6), or (7).
(6)  The securities activities authorized by this section may be conducted
from an authorized banking office or from a separate office of a subsidiary,
and may be offered to customers in this state or in any other state,
territory, or country, except to the extent such activities are limited or
prohibited by the laws of the other state, territory, or country.
(7)  Before undertaking any of the direct or indirect securities activities
permitted under this section, except those authorized by Subsection (2)(a), a
bank shall apply to the commissioner.  The commissioner shall render a
decision of approval, conditional approval, or disapproval within 60 days from
the date of receiving the application.  Public notice is not required for any
hearing on the application that may be held.  The commissioner shall satisfy
himself before approving the application that the bank possesses the
managerial and financial resources necessary to conduct the securities
activities safely and soundly.
(8)  In conducting securities activities, a bank shall in all respects comply,
and cause its securities subsidiary to comply, with the Utah Uniform
Securities Act, the Securities Act of 1933, the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, the Investment Company Act of 1940, and other applicable statutes,
regulations, and rules.
(9)  In connection with each customer for which a bank or its securities
subsidiary shall act as agent or broker, the bank or the subsidiary, as
applicable, shall give a written disclosure to its customer prior to closing
any single transaction or establishment of an account contemplating a series
of transactions.  The disclosure statement shall be in legible print and shall
be in substantially the form shown in Subsection (9)(a) with respect to the
bank and in Subsection (9)(b) with respect to any securities subsidiary.
(a)
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT
The services offered by the securities department of this bank are offered to
its customers without regard to any other banking relationship.   By signing
below the customer acknowledges receipt of this Disclosure Statement and
agrees that any contract for securities services is completely voluntary, and
the selection of this bank for securities services has not been required by
any other business relationship or account with the bank.
__________(month/day/year).
       CUSTOMER:
___________________________
___________________________
(b)
DISCLOSURE STATEMENT
_________________ (name of securities agency subsidiary) is a subsidiary of
______________ (name of bank).  The services offered by _________________
(name of subsidiary) are offered to its customers without regard to any
separate banking relationship with _______________ (name of bank).  By signing
below the customer acknowledges receipt of this Disclosure Statement and
agrees that any contract for services with _______________ (name of
subsidiary) is completely voluntary and the selection of _______________ (name
of subsidiary) for securities services has not been required by any business
relationship with its parent bank.
__________(month/day/year).
       CUSTOMER:
___________________________
___________________________
